New York, session 2025-2026, S3148.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (f) of subdivision 2 of section 367-w of the 2 social services law, as added by section 1 of part ZZ of chapter 56 of 3 the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 4 (f) "Municipal corporation" means a county outside the city of New 5 York, a city, including the city of New York, a town, a village, a fire 6 district, or a school district. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03173-01-5